Virginia statutes. Title 37.2. Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.
Article 3. Office of the Inspector General for Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.

§§ 37.2-423 through 37.2-425.
Repealed by Acts 2011, cc. 798 and 871, cl. 2, effective July 1, 2012.

Cross references.

For note regarding the recodification of

Titles 2.1

and 9 as new

Titles 2.2

and 9.1, and accompanying revision of other material, see the note under §

2.2-100

.

Editor’s note.

Former §

37.2-423

, creating the Office of Inspector General for Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, derived from 2000, c. 927, § 2.1-815; 2001, c. 844, § 37.1- 255; 2004, c. 169; 2005, c. 716; 2009, cc. 813, 840.
Former
§ 37.2-424, pertaining to powers and duties of Inspector General, derived from 2000, c. 927, § 2.1-816; 2001, cc. 792, 844, § 37.1-256; 2003, cc. 35, 40, 450; 2004, c. 169; 2005, c. 716. Former § 37.2-425, pertaining to reports, derived from 2001, c. 792, § 2.1-816.1, § 37.1-256.1; 2002, c. 82; 2003, cc. 35, 40, 450; 2004, c. 169; 2005, c. 716.